Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1504
Seal; when required; certified copies.

The register of deeds shall have and keep an official seal, which may be either an engraved or ink stamp seal, and which shall have included thereon the name of the county, register of deeds, and the word Nebraska, and he shall attach an impression or representation of said seal to every certificate made by him except such as are required to be endorsed upon instruments filed in his office for record. Copies of any record in his office, certified under his hand and said official seal, shall be receivable in evidence in all respects in the same manner as the original records.

Laws 1887, c. 30, § 31, p. 377;

R.S.1913, § 5619;

C.S.1922, § 4946;

C.S.1929, § 26-1204;

R.S.1943, § 23-1504;

Laws 1971, LB 653, § 3.